Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB218.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 15 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be
known as the vaping settlement trust fund. The fund shall be administered by the
Office of the Attorney General.
(2) The fund shall consist of all proceeds received by the Commonwealth on or after
July 15, 2025, excluding fees awarded to the Office of the Attorney General as
litigation or investigative costs, as a result of any settlement, judgment, or
bankruptcy proceeding against Juul Labs, Inc., including but not limited to
Commonwealth of Kentucky, ex. rel. Daniel Cameron, Attorney General v. Juul
Labs, Inc., 22-CI-00942.
(3) Amounts deposited into the fund shall be allocated as follows and distributed no
less than annually:
(a) Fifty percent (50%) shall be used only by the Kentucky Agency for
Substance Abuse Policy for distribution to programs implemented under
KRS 15A.344 specifically for the purpose of youth vaping cessation
programming; and
(b) Fifty percent (50%) shall be used only by the Department of Alcoholic
Beverage Control to carry out the enforcement provisions of KRS 438.305
to 438.340.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 12/23/2024 8:46 AM Jacketed